Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4924.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 217. (1) Subject to subsection (2), the department shall issue a license or a certificate of registration for an occupation under this act without examination to an individual who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that he or she the individual meets all of the following at the time of application: (a) Provides proof that the individual is 1 of the following: (i) A member of the armed forces or uniformed services. (ii) A veteran. (iii) A dependent of a member of the armed forces, a member of the uniformed services, or a veteran. (a) (b) Holds a valid license or registration in that occupation from an equivalent licensing department, board, or authority, as determined by the department, in at least 1 other state of the United States. For each license or registration described in this subdivision that he or she the applicant holds, all of the following must be met: (i) The license or registration is in good standing and he or she the applicant has held that license or registration for at least not less than 1 year. (ii) There were minimum education requirements and, if applicable, work experience requirements in effect for licensure or registration in the other state, and the other state verifies that he or she the applicant met those requirements for licensure or registration in that state. (iii) If the other state required an examination for licensure or registration, he or she the applicant passed the examination. (iv) The requirements for licensure or registration in the other state are substantially equivalent to or exceed the requirements of this act and any rule promulgated under this act for the license or registration. (b) (c) Has not had a license or registration revoked, and has not voluntarily surrendered a license or registration, in any other state of the United States or a foreign country while under investigation for unprofessional conduct. (c) (d) Has not had discipline imposed by any equivalent licensing department, board, or authority in another state of the United States. If another state of the United States has taken disciplinary action against the applicant, the department shall determine if the cause for the action was corrected and the matter resolved. If the matter has not been resolved by that other state, the department shall not issue or deny a license or registration until the matter is resolved. (d) (e) Does not have a complaint, allegation, or investigation pending before an equivalent licensing department, board, or authority in another state of the United States or a foreign country that relates to unprofessional conduct. If the applicant has any complaints, allegations, or investigations pending, the department shall suspend the application process and shall not issue or deny a license or registration to the applicant until the complaint, allegation, or investigation is resolved. (e) (f) Pays all applicable fees. (f) (g) Is of good moral character. (g) (h) Meets the age requirement of that occupation under this act, if applicable. (2) If the department determines that the issuance of issuing a license or a certificate of registration under subsection (1) for an occupation under this act may result in a violation of a federal oversight or licensing guideline for that occupation, the department shall not issue a license or a certificate of registration. (3) This section does not prevent the department from issuing a temporary license under section 213, a courtesy license under section 1806a, or a certificate under section 726, or issuing a license under section 726, 1108(2), 1211, 1806(9), 2013, 2209, or 2623.